Hawaii statutes.
[§240-1.6] Cable surcharge
amounts exempt. Amounts received in the form of a cable surcharge by an
electric utility company acting on behalf of an affected certified cable
company under section 269-134 shall not be deemed gross receipts for that
electric utility company for purposes of this chapter; provided that any
amounts retained by that electric utility company for collection or other costs
shall not be included in this exemption. [L 2012, c 165, §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next